Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1072.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3117(t)(2) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 3117. Automated red light enforcement systems in certain municipalities.* * *(t) Definitions.--As used in this section:* * *(2) The term "municipality" means:* * *(iv) A county of the second class.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415161718